Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 2. HEALTH

SUBTITLE E. HEALTH CARE COUNCILS AND RESOURCE CENTERS

CHAPTER 107A. CENTER FOR ELIMINATION OF DISPROPORTIONALITY AND DISPARITIES

Sec. 107A.001. CENTER FOR ELIMINATION OF DISPROPORTIONALITY AND DISPARITIES. The executive commissioner shall maintain a center for elimination of disproportionality and disparities in the commission to:

(1) assume a leadership role in working or contracting with state and federal agencies, universities, private interest groups, communities, foundations, and offices of minority health to develop health initiatives to decrease or eliminate health and health access disparities among racial, multicultural, disadvantaged, ethnic, and regional populations, including appropriate language services; and

(2) maximize use of existing resources without duplicating existing efforts.

Redesignated from Health and Safety Code, Subchapter G, Chapter 12 and amended by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 222 (H.B. 1396), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 121 (S.B. 501), Sec. 2, eff. May 21, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0353, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 107A.002. POWERS OF CENTER. The center may:

(1) provide a central information and referral source, including a clearinghouse for health disparities information, and serve as the primary state resource in coordinating, planning, and advocating access to health care services to eliminate health disparities in this state;

(2) coordinate conferences and other training opportunities to increase skills among state agencies and government staff in management and in the appreciation of cultural diversity;

(3) pursue and administer grant funds for innovative projects for communities, groups, and individuals;

(4) provide recommendations and training in improving minority recruitment in state agencies;

(5) publicize information regarding health disparities and minority health issues through the use of the media;

(6) network with existing minority organizations, community-based health groups, and statewide health coalitions;

(7) solicit, receive, and spend grants, gifts, and donations from public and private sources; and

(8) contract with public and private entities in the performance of its responsibilities.

Redesignated from Health and Safety Code, Subchapter G, Chapter 12 and amended by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 222 (H.B. 1396), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 121 (S.B. 501), Sec. 2, eff. May 21, 2011.

Sec. 107A.003. FUNDING. The commission may distribute to the center unobligated and unexpended appropriations to be used to carry out its powers.

Redesignated from Health and Safety Code, Subchapter G, Chapter 12 and amended by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 222 (H.B. 1396), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 121 (S.B. 501), Sec. 2, eff. May 21, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0354, eff. April 2, 2015.